src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON EABBUCASE2 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjn%> PxPlComC ;

LEXICON EABBU_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žasa%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill:»X6žij K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc:»X6žis K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X6žin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:»X6žijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X6žijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X6žij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žistti%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»X6š%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:»X6žit K ;
 :%> EABBUCASE1_NVD ;
 :%> EABBUCASE2_NVD ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X8t K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth:%>X7t K ;
 +Attr+Err/Orth: ATTR  ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE1_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X1 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X7 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth: PxV ;
 +Ess:X1n K ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:X7n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X1n%> PxC ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X7n%> PxC ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE2_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;


LEXICON BU/MUS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp:b BUStem ;
 +Superl:muss BUOREMUS ; 
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:t K ;


LEXICON BUStem !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 ATTRCONT ;
 +Sg+Gen:u K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: K ;
 +Sg+Acc:u K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ut K ;
 +Ess:un K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»uš%> ATTRCONT ; 
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:»uš K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»užža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +Sg+Ill:uj K ;
 +Sg+Loc:us K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:un K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ujn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ujd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:ujd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:ujd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ujdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ujn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:ujs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:ujgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:uj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ustti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ujnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ujddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ujddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ujddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ujddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ujnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ujddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:ut K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px2V ;
! +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px3V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:u%> Px3V ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:usa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:uiddá%> Px1V ;
