src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
eanet+A:eane%> BU/MUS ;
loaččat+A:loačča%> BU/MUS ;
vearát+A+Comp:vearáb BUStem ;
árrat+A:ára%> BU/MUS ;
